Utah statutes.
31A-35-405.   Issuance of license -- Denial -- Right of appeal.
(1)  Upon a determination by the board that a person applying for a bail bond
surety company license meets the requirements for issuance of a license under
this chapter, the commissioner shall issue to that person a bail bond surety
company license.
(2) (a)  If the commissioner denies an application for a bail bond surety
company license under this chapter, the commissioner shall provide prompt
written notification to the person applying for licensure:
(i)  stating the grounds for denial; and
(ii)  notifying the person applying for licensure as a bail bond surety
company that:
(A)  the person is entitled to a hearing if that person wants to contest the
denial; and
(B)  if the person wants a hearing, the person shall submit the request in
writing to the commissioner within 15 days after the issuance of the denial.
(b)  The department shall schedule a hearing described in Subsection (2)(a) no
later than 60 days after the commissioner's receipt of the request.
(c)  The department shall hear the appeal, and may:
(i)  return the case to the commissioner for reconsideration;
(ii)  modify the commissioner's decision; or
(iii)  reverse the commissioner's decision.
(3)  A decision under this section is subject to review under Title 63G,
Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.
